New Jersey, session 222, S2054.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The board of county commissioners of any county may by resolution establish a Sharing Resources grant and loan program for local units within the county that plan to study the feasibility of a shared service agreement, a joint meeting contract, or municipal consolidation. Grant and loan monies may be used to fund studies, consultant costs and one-time start-up costs of a shared service agreement, joint meeting contract, or municipal consolidation.  The board of county commissioners, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs, may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of its program. b.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall provide common guidelines and procedures for the submission of grant applications to a county Sharing Resources grant program. c.     Applications for one-time start-up costs shall provide that: (1)   Local units may apply for financial assistance for the one-time start-up costs necessary to implement shared services.  Costs that may be financed through the issuance of debt or capital lease agreements are excluded from this program. (2)   The board of county commissioners may set limits on aid awards and negotiate the various provisions, costs, payment provisions, and amounts of grants or loans to ensure that the proposed shared service is cost effective and in the public interest. d.    The board of county commissioners may provide technical support programs to assist local units in applying for grants or aid for studying shared services. 2.    The board of county commissioners may receive and expend moneys from the State, the federal government, or private individuals, corporations or associations, to meet all or a portion of the expenses of the Sharing Resources grant and loan program, and may raise by taxation, pursuant to R.S.40:23-7, all or a portion of the money necessary to pay for the program. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.